District of Columbia statutes.
9-1215.06

Repealed

Marker locations.

Repealed.

Apr. 30, 1998, D.C. Law 12-98, § 7, 45 DCR 1519
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 258, 62 DCR 1884
This section is referenced in § 9-1215.02 and § 9-1215.07.
1981 Ed., § 7-236.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 258 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 258 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).